Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 8 UNDERGROUND CONVERSION OF UTILITIES
29-8-130. Civil action - grounds.

No civil action shall be brought or maintained to enjoin the collection of assessments or otherwise test the validity of assessments levied under this article except upon the following grounds:

That notice of a hearing upon the amount of the assessment was not given as required in this article. Any person presenting objections to the governing body at or before the hearing on assessments shall be deemed to have waived this ground.

That the hearing upon the amount of the assessment as provided in this article was not held;

That the improvement ordered was not one authorized by this article;

That the assessment levied exceeds the benefits received by the property assessed.

Every person whose property is subject to such special assessment and who fails to appear during the public hearings on said assessment to raise his objection to such assessment shall be deemed to have waived all objection to such assessment, except objections on grounds specified in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section. Any action brought under this article shall be commenced within thirty days after the passage of the assessing resolution or else be thereafter perpetually barred. Any such action shall be given preference in the courts of the state. If such action is unsuccessful, the courts may order the plaintiff to pay the costs thereof, and, in its discretion, may require a bond in a sufficient amount to cover such costs at the commencement of such action. The burden of proof to show that such special assessment or part thereof is invalid, inequitable, or unjust shall rest upon the party who brings such suit.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 998, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-30.

29-8-131. Conversion costs.

In determining the conversion costs included in the costs and feasibility report required by section 29-8-108, the public utility shall be entitled to amounts sufficient to repay them, with a reasonable allowance for overhead expense, for the following, as computed and reflected by the uniform system of accounts approved by the public utilities commission or federal communications commission, or in the event the public utility is not subject to regulation by either of the above governmental agencies, by the public utility's system of accounts then in use and in accordance with standard accounting procedures of said public utility:

The original costs less depreciation taken of the existing overhead electric and communication facilities to be removed;

The estimated costs of removing such overhead electric and communication facilities, less the salvage value of the facilities removed;

If the estimated cost of constructing underground facilities exceeds the original cost of existing overhead electric and communication facilities, then the difference between the two;

The cost of obtaining new easements when technical considerations make it reasonably necessary to utilize easements for the underground facilities different from those used for aboveground facilities, or where the preexisting easements are insufficient for the underground facilities.

However, in the event that conversion costs are included in tariffs, rules, or regulations filed and in effect with the public utilities commission, such conversion costs shall be the cost included in the costs and feasibility report.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 998, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-31.

29-8-132. Maintenance, construction, and title to converted facilities.

The public utility has the duty to maintain, repair, and replace all underground facilities installed under this article. There shall be no competitive bidding as to the construction of the converted facilities since existing facilities are owned, maintained, and operated by the public utility and the continuity of service of the utility is essential, both of which make construction work by third persons impracticable. Therefore, the public utility concerned shall be responsible for the accomplishment of all construction work and may contract out such of the construction work as it deems desirable. Title to the converted facilities shall be at all times solely and exclusively in the public utility involved, as the public is only purchasing the intangible benefits which come from converted facilities, that is, the removal of the overhead facilities and replacement by underground facilities.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 999, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-32.

29-8-133. Conversion costs and service connection.

The public utility performing the conversion shall, at the expense of the property owner, convert to underground all electric and communication service facilities located upon any lot or parcel of land within the improvement district and not within the easement for distribution. This shall include the digging and the back filling of a trench upon such lot or parcel, unless the owner executes a written objection thereto and files the same with the clerk of the governing body not later than the date set for hearing objections to the improvement district as provided by law. Failure to file such written objection shall be taken as a consent and grant of easement to the public utility and shall be construed as express authority to the public utility and their respective officers, agents, and employees to enter upon such lot or parcel for such purpose, and, through failure to object, any right of protest or objection with respect to the doing of such work shall be waived. If an owner does file such written objection, he shall then be responsible for providing a trench which is in accordance with applicable rules, regulations, or tariffs from the owner's service entrance to a point designated by the public utility and for back filling a trench following installation of the underground service by the public utility involved.

In any event, the cost of any work done by the public utility shall be included in the assessment to be levied upon such lot or parcel. Should a written objection be filed as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the owner involved shall be obligated for and the public utility involved shall be entitled to payment for the actual cost for such work accomplished upon the owner's property by the public utility; such amount shall be less than the cost if the public utility had performed the trenching and back filling.

The owner shall, at his expense, make all necessary changes in the service entrance equipment to accept underground service.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 999, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-33.

29-8-134. Notice of possible disconnection.

There shall be included in the notice of the public hearing concerning the improvements required by section 29-8-110 notice that all owners of land within the local improvement district may file written requests for inclusion of the cost of conversion of utility facilities upon their property within the contemplation of section 29-8-133. Such notice shall further advise that any owner who does not execute the objections provided for in section 29-8-133, or otherwise provide for underground service connections to his property, in a manner satisfactory to the public utility involved, shall be subject to disconnection from the electric or communication facilities providing service to all buildings, structures, and improvements located upon the lot or parcel.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1000, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-34.

29-8-135. Notice of disconnection.

If the owner or person in possession of any lot or parcel of land prevents entrance upon the lot or parcel for conversion purposes, or fails to perform under section 29-8-133 and has not otherwise provided for underground service connections to the property in a manner satisfactory to the public utility involved, within sixty days from the time the converted facilities are ready for connection to the property, the electric or communication service shall be disconnected and removed and all overhead electric or communication facilities providing service to any building, structure, and improvement located upon such lot or parcel shall be disconnected. Written notice of disconnection shall be given at least twenty days prior to disconnection by leaving a copy of such notice at the principal building, structure, or improvement located upon such lot or parcel.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1000, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-35.

29-8-136. Payment of public utility.

Upon completion of the conversion contemplated by this article, the public utility shall present the governing body with its verified bill for conversion costs, as computed under section 29-8-131, but based upon the actual cost of constructing the underground facility rather than the estimated cost of the facility. In no event shall the bill for conversion cost presented by the public utility exceed the amount of estimated conversion costs by the public utility. In the event the conversion costs are less than the estimated conversion costs, each owner within the improvement district shall receive the benefit, prorated in such form and at such time as the governing body determines. The bill of the public utility shall be paid within thirty days by the governing body from the improvement district funds or such other source as is properly designated by the governing body. In determining the actual cost of constructing the underground facility, the public utility shall use its standard accounting procedures, such as the uniform system of accounts as defined by the federal communications commission and as is in use at the time of the conversion by the public utility involved, as described in section 29-8-131.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1000, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-36.

29-8-137. Reinstallation of overhead facilities not permitted.

Once removed, no overhead electric or communication facilities may be installed in a local improvement district for conversion of overhead electric and communication facilities.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1000, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-37.

29-8-137.5. Applicability to cable operators.

This article shall apply to the overhead communication facilities of cable operators, and those provisions that refer to a public utility or public utilities shall also apply to cable operators.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 373, § 5, effective April 22.

29-8-138. No limitation on public utilities commission jurisdiction or franchises.

Nothing contained in this article shall vest any jurisdiction over any public utility in the governing bodies. The public utilities commission shall retain all jurisdiction conferred on it by law. Nothing contained in this article shall be interpreted in such a way as to be in conflict with franchises granted to any public utility, and in the event of any conflict, such franchises shall control over the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1001, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-38.

29-8-139. Nonseverability.

If any provision of this article is held invalid, such invalidity shall invalidate this article in its entirety, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be nonseverable.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1001, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-39.

29-8-140. Abatement of construction.

If an improvement district is established under this article, the public utility involved shall not be required to commence conversion until the resolution, the assessment roll, and issuance of bonds have become final and no civil action has been filed, or if civil action has been filed, until the decision of the court upon the action has become final and is not subject to further appeal.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1001, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-40.

29-8-141. Early hearings.

All cases in which there may arise a question of validity of the organization of a district or a question of the validity of any proceeding under this article shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purpose of this article.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1001, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-41.

29-8-142. Liberal construction.

This article, being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, and general welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purpose.

Source:

L. 71:

p. 1001, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-23-42.